lt-LT: Antgalio stilius: Koncentratorius; Lenktas; Prailginimas; Plokščias; Latakų valymas; Mulčiavimas; Osciliuojantis; Apvalus; Šlavyklė; Kita
ko: 노즐 스타일: 콘센트레이터; 곡선형; 연장; 플랫; 홈통  클리닝; 멀칭; 진동; 라운드; 스위퍼; 기타
zh-CN: 喷嘴样式: 集中型; 弯头; 延长管; 平口; 排水沟清洁; 覆盖; 摆动式; 圆形; 清扫; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl trysky: Koncentrátor; Zaoblená; Rozšírenie; Plochá; Čistenie odkvapov; Mulčovacia; Oscilačná; Okrúhla; Zametač; Iné
tr: Nozul stili: Konsantratör; Kavisli; Uzatma; Düz; Oluk temizleme ucu; Malçlama; Salınımlı; Yuvarlak; Süpürme; Diğer
ro-RO: Stil de duză: Concentrator; Curbat; Prelungire; Plat; Curățarea jgheaburilor; Mulcire; Oscilant; Rotund; Ștergător; Altele
ja: ノズルのスタイル: コンセントレーター; 湾曲; 延長; フラット; 雨樋クリーニング; マルチング; 回転式; ラウンド; スイーパー; その他
ru: Тип насадки: Концентратор; Изогнутая; Удлинительная; Плоская; Очистка водосточных желобов; Для мульчирования; Осциллирующая; Круглая; Для подметания; Другое
hr-HR: Stil mlaznice: Koncentrator; Zaobljeno; Produžetak; Ravna; Za čišćenje oluka; Malčiranje; Oscilirajuća; Okrugla; Profil za odbijanje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип дюза: Концентратор; Извито; Удължение; Плоско; Почистване на улуци; Мулчиране; Осцилиращо; Кръгло; Долен уплътнител; Друго
pl: Styl dyszy: Koncentrator; Zakrzywione; Przedłużkie; Płaskie; Do czyszczenia rynien; Do mulczowania; Oscylacyjne; Okrągłe; Zamiatarka; Pozostałe
it: Modello di ugello: Concentratore; Curvo; Estensibile; Piatto; Pulizia delle grondaie; Pacciamatura; Oscillante; Rotondo; Profilo a spazzola; Altro
cs: Typ trysky: Tvarovací; Zahnuté; Prodlužovací; Ploché; Čištění žlabů; Mulčovací; Oscilační; Kruhové; Zametací; Jiné
da: Dysestil: Koncentrator; Buet; Udvidelse; Flad; Rengøring af tagrender; Mulching; Oscillerende; Rund; Sweeper; Andet
nl: Type spuitmond: Concentratiemondstuk; Gebogen; Verlengbaar; Vlak; Gootreiniging; Mulchen; Oscillerend; Rond; Sleepprofiel; Overig
hu: Fúvóka stílusa: Koncentrátor; Ívelt; Hosszabbító; Lapos; Ereszcsatorna-tisztítás; Mulcsozó; Oszcilláló; Kerek; Szűrőcső; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu dáng vòi phun: Vòi phun tập trung; Cong; Nối dài; Phẳng; Vệ sinh máng xối; Lớp phủ; Dao động; Tròn; Dạng quét; Khác
fr: Style de buse: Concentrateur; Incurvé; Extension; Plat; Nettoyage des gouttières; Paillage; Oscillante; Rond; Bavette; Autre
sl-SI: Tip šobe: Koncentrator; Ukrivljena; Podaljšana; Ploščata; Čiščenje žlebov; Mulčenje; Oscilirajoče; Okrogel; Pometač; Druga
nb: Dysestil: Konsentrator; Buet; Forlengelse; Flat; Rengjøring av takrenner; Jorddekking; Oscillerende; Rund; Feier; Annet
pt-BR: Estilo de bocal: Concentrador; Curvado; Extensão; Plano; Limpeza de calhas; Cobertura morta; Oscilatória; Redondo; Vassoura; Outro
es: Estilo de boquilla: Concentrador; Curvado; Extensión; Plano; Limpieza de canalones; Mantillo; Oscilante; Redondo; Barredor; Otros
sv: Stil på munstycke: Koncentrator; Rundad; Förlängning; Platt; Rengöring av stuprör; Kompostering; Oscillerande; Rund; sweper,jam; Övrigt
fi: Suutintyyli: Keskitin; Kaareva; Laajennettu; Tasainen; Vesikourujen puhdistus; Silppuri; Oskilloiva; Pyöreä; Kynnys; Muu
zh-TW: 噴嘴風格: 濃縮機; 弧形; 延長; 平嘴; 清理排水槽用; 覆蓋; 旋轉震盪; 圓形; 掃地機; 其他
el: Στυλ ακροφυσίου: Συγκεντρωτικό; Καμπύλο; Προέκταση; Επίπεδο; Καθαρισμός υδρορροών; Mulching; Παλινδρομικό; Στρογγυλό; Τύπου σκούπας; Άλλο
pt-PT: Estilo do bocal: Concentrador; Curvado; Extensão; Liso; Limpeza de caleiras; Cobertura morta; Oscilante; Redondo; Varredora; Outro
en: Nozzle style: Concentrator; Curved; Extension; Flat; Gutter cleaning; Mulching; Oscillating; Round; Sweeper; Other
de: Düsenstil: Konzentrator; Gebogen; Verlängerung; Flach; Dachrinnenreinigung; Mulchen; Oszillierend; Kreis; Sweeper; Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบหัวฉีด: เครื่องเพิ่มความเข้มข้น; โค้ง; ต่อความยาว; เรียบ; แบบทำความสะอาดรางน้ำ; การคลุมดิน; หมุนสลับ; ทรงกลม; เครื่องกวาด; อื่นๆ